Missouri, session 2026, HB2226.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 23.140, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 23.140, to read as follows:
23.140. 1. Legislation, with the exception of appropriation bills, introduced into
either house of the general assembly shall, before being acted upon, be submitted to the
oversight division of the committee on legislative research for the preparation of a fiscal note.
The staff of the oversight division shall prepare a fiscal note, examining the items contained
in subsection 2 and such additional items as may be provided either by joint rule of the house
and senate or by resolution adopted by the committee or the oversight subcommittee.
2. The fiscal note shall state:
(1) The cost of the proposed legislation to the state for the next two fiscal years;
(2) Whether or not the proposed legislation will establish a program or agency that
will duplicate an existing program or agency;
(3) Whether or not there is a federal mandate for the program or agency;
(4) Whether or not the proposed program or agency will have significant direct fiscal
impact upon any political subdivision of the state;
(5) Whether or not any new physical facilities will be required; [and]
(6) Whether or not the proposed legislation will have an economic impact on small
businesses. For the purpose of this subdivision "small business" means a corporation,
partnership, sole proprietorship or other business entity, including its affiliates, that:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2226 2
(a) Is independently owned and operated; and
(b) Employs fifty or fewer full-time employees; and
(7) An estimate of the employee hours required to implement a new program.
3. The fiscal note for a bill shall accompany the bill throughout its course of passage.
No member of the general assembly, lobbyist or persons other than oversight division staff
members shall participate in the preparation of any fiscal note unless the communication is in
writing, with a duplicate to be filed with the fiscal note or unless requested for information by
the fiscal analyst preparing the note. Violations of this provision shall be reported to the
chairman of the legislative research committee and subject the fiscal note and proposed bill to
subcommittee review. Once a fiscal note has been signed and approved by the director of the
oversight division, the note shall not be changed or revised without prior approval of the
chairman of the legislative research committee, except to reflect changes made in the bill it
accompanies, or to correct patent typographical, clerical or drafting errors that do not involve
changes of substance, nor shall substitution be made therefor. Appeals to revise, change or to
substitute a fiscal note shall be made in writing by a member of the general assembly to the
chairman of the legislative research committee and a hearing before the committee or
subcommittee shall be granted as soon as possible. Any member of the general assembly,
upon presentation of new or additional material, may, within three legislative days after the
hearing on the request to revise, change or substitute a fiscal note, request one rehearing
before the full committee to further consider the requested change. The subcommittee, if
satisfied that new or additional material has been presented, may recommend such rehearing
to the full committee, and the rehearing shall be held as soon as possible thereafter.
4. The director of the division, hereinafter provided for, or the director's designees,
shall seek information and advice from the affected department, division or agency of state
government and shall call upon the research staffs of the house of representatives and of the
senate, and upon the staffs of the house and senate appropriations committees for assistance in
carrying out fiscal notes and evaluations of programs selected by the committee, during the
interim, and each staff shall supply such information or advice as it deems appropriate in
response to the inquiry. The state auditor shall, upon request, cooperate and provide
assistance in the conduct of audits and the preparation of reports made in connection
therewith.
✔